es: Diseño de fuente: Abstracto moderno; Pila para pájaros; Roca burbujeante; Cascada; Columna; Desapareciendo; Olla/Jarra; Formación de la roca; Lavabo autónomo; Solar flotante; Esfera/Bola; Chorros; Estatua/Figurilla; Sobremesa; Escalonada; Traditional; Urna; Pared; Panel de cascada; Otros
en: Fountain design: Abstract Modern; Birdbath; Bubbling Rock; Cascading; Column; Disappearing; Pot/Jar; Rock Formation; Self-Contained Basin; Solar Floating; Sphere/Ball; Spouting; Statue/Figurine; Tabletop; Tiered; Traditional; Urn; Wall; Waterfall Panel; Other
ja: 噴水のデザイン: 抽象モダン; 水盤; 水の出る岩; 小滝; カラム; 消えるタイプ; ポット/ジャー; 岩石構造; 自己完結型水盤; ソーラーフローティング; 球体/ボール; 噴出; 彫像/小像; 卓上; ティアード; 伝統的; 壺型; 壁掛け; 滝パネル; その他
nb: Fontenedesign: Abstrakt moderne; Fuglebad; Boblende stein; Kaskade; Søyle; Forsvinnende; Gryte/krukke; Steinformasjon; Selvforsynt basseng; Solcelledrevet flytende; Kule/ball; Sprutende; Statue/figur; Bordplate; Flernivå; Tradisjonell; Urne; Vegg; Fosspanel; Annet
zh-TW: 噴泉設計: 抽象現代; 鳥盆噴泉; 噴泉岩石; 層疊式; 立柱式; 隱藏式噴泉; 鍋/罐; 岩層式; 自給式水盆; 太陽能浮動式; 球體/球形; 噴水; 雕像/小雕像; 桌上型; 分層式; 傳統; 陶甕形; 牆壁式; 瀑布板; 其他
de: Brunnendesign: Abstrakt Modern; Vogeltränke; Blubbernder Felsen; Kaskaden; Säule; Wasserspiel; Topf/Glas; Gesteinsformation; In sich geschlossenes Becken; Schwimmender Solarbrunnen; Kugel/Ball; Auslauf; Statue/Figur; Tischgerät; Gestuft; Traditionell; Urne; Wand; Wasserwand; Sonstiges
vi: Thiết kế đài phun nước: Hiện đại trừu tượng; Bể tắm cho chim; Đá phun nước tạo bọt; Kiểu thác đổ tầng; Cột; Kiểu thác ẩn; Kiểu chậu/hũ; Quá trình hình thành đá; Bể chứa khép kín; Nổi bằng năng lượng mặt trời; Hình cầu/Quả bóng; Kiểu vòi phun; Tượng/Hình điêu khắc nhỏ; Để mặt bàn; Nhiều tầng; Truyền thống; Cái vại; Tường; Tấm tường thác nước; Khác
da: Fontænedesign: Abstrakt, moderne; Fuglebad; Boblende sten; Fossende; Kolonne; Forsvinder; Gryde/krukke; Klippeformation; Selvstændigt bassin; Flydende solar; Kugle/bold; Sprøjtning; Statue/figur; Bordplade; I niveauer; Traditionel; Urne; Væg; Vandfaldspanel; Andet
ru: Конструкция фонтана: Абстрактный модерн; Купальня для птиц; Бурлящий камень; Каскад; Колонна; Исчезающий; Горшок/кувшин; Композиция из камней; Автономный бассейн; Плавучие солнечные батареи; Сфера/шар; Фонтанирование; Статуя/фигурка; Настольный; Многоярусный; Традиционный; Ваза; Настенный; Панель-водопад; Другой
sk-SK: Dizajn fontány: Abstraktný moderný; Napájadlo; Bublajúca skala; Kaskáda; Stĺpec; S efektom miznúcej vody; Nádoba/Pohár; Skalný útvar; Samostatná nádrž; Solárna plávajúca; Guľa/Lopta; Striekajúca; Socha/figúrka; Stolová; Viacúrovňová; Tradičná; Urna; Nástenná; Panel vodopádu; Iné
ko: 분수 디자인: 추상 현대식; 버드배스; 버블링 락; 캐스케이딩; 기둥; 디스피어링; 항아리/단지; 암석 성상; 일체형 수조; 태양광 플로팅; 구형/볼; 스파우팅; 조각상/피규어; 테이블탑; 티어드; 전통; 항아리; 벽; 워터폴 패널; 기타
hu: Szökőkút tervezés: Absztrakt modern; Madárfürdő; Bugyborékoló sziklaképződmény; Lépcsőzetes; Oszlop; Eltűnő; Edény/üveg; Sziklaképződmény; Beépített medence; Napelemes, lebegő; Gömb/golyó; Vízsugarat lövell; Szobor/figura; Asztali; Emeletes; Hagyományos; Urna; Fal; Vízesés panel; Egyéb
fi: Suihkulähteen muotoilu: Abstrakti moderni; Lintukylpy; Kupliva kivi; Porrastettu; Pylväs; Katoava; Ruukku; Kivimuodostelma; Itsenäinen allas; Aurinkoenergialla toimiva, kelluva; Kuula/pallo; Suihkuttava; Patsas/hahmo; Pöydällä pidettävä; Kerroksellinen; Perinteinen; Uurna; Seinä; Vesiputouspaneeli; Muu
ro-RO: Designul fântânii: Modern abstract; Baie pentru păsări; Stâncă cu bule; Cascadă; Coloană; Dispare; Oală/borcan; Formațiune stâncoasă; Bazin autonom; Solar plutitor; Sferă/minge; Jet; Statuie/figurină; De masă; Pe niveluri; Tradițional; Urnă; Perete; Panou cascadă; Altele
tr: Çeşme tasarımı: Soyut Modern; Kuş banyosu; Kabarcıklı kaya; Kademeli akış; Sütun; Gizli hazneli; Çömlek / Kavanoz; Kaya Formasyonu; Entegre hazneli; Güneş Enerjili Yüzer; Küre/Top; Fışkırmalı; Heykel/Figür; Masaüstü; Kademeli; Geleneksel; Kül kabı vazo; Duvar; Şelale Paneli; Diğer
sl-SI: Zasnova fontane: Abstraktno moderno; Ptičja kopel; Brbotajoča skala; Cascade; Stolp; Izginjanje; Lonec/kozarec; Nastanek kamnine; Samostojni bazen; Sončna plavajoča; Krogla/Žoga; Bruhanje; Kip/figurica; Namizni; Stopnjevano; Tradicionalno; Amfora; Na steni; Slapna plošča; Druga
pt-PT: Design da fonte: Abstrato moderno; Bebedouro para aves; Rocha borbulhante; Cascata; Coluna; A desaparecer; Pote/Frasco; Formação rochosa; Bacia independente; Flutuante solar; Esfera/Bola; A jorrar; Estátua/Estatueta; Mesa; Em camadas; Tradicional; Urna; Parede; Painel de cascata; Outro
el: Σχεδιασμός σιντριβανιού: Αφηρημένο μοντέρνο; Ποτίστρα πουλιών; Πέτρα με αναβλύζον νερό; Κλιμακωτό (με καταρράκτη); Στήλη; Με κρυφή/εξαφανιζόμενη δεξαμενή; Γλάστρα/δοχείο; Σχηματισμός πετρώματος; Με ενσωματωμένη λεκάνη; Ηλιακό πλωτό; Σφαίρα/μπάλα; Με εκροή/στόμιο; Άγαλμα/φιγούρα; Επιτραπέζια; Πολυεπίπεδη; Παραδοσιακή; Δοχείο; Τοίχος; Πάνελ καταρράκτη; Άλλο
it: Design della fontana: Astratto moderno; Bagno per uccelli; Roccia gorgogliante; Cascade; Colonna; A scomparsa; Vaso/Barattolo; Formazione rocciosa; Lavabo autonomo; Galleggiante solare; Sfera/Palla; Zampillante; Statua/Figurina; Da tavolo; A più livelli; Tradizionale; Urna; Parete; Pannello a cascata; Altro
pt-BR: Design da fonte: Abstrato moderno; Banheira para pássaros; Rocha borbulhante; Em cascata; Coluna; Reservatório oculto; Pote/Jarra; Formação rochosa; Bacia autônoma; Flutuante com energia solar; Esfera/bola; Jato de água; Estátua/Estatueta; Tampo de mesa; Em camadas; Tradicional; Urna; Parede; Painel de cascata; Outro
nl: Fonteinontwerp: Abstract-modern; Vogelbad; Borrelende rots; Cascade; Kolom; Onzichtbaar (bassin); Kruik/pot; Rotsformatie; Zelfstandig bassin; Zonne-energie drijvende constructie; Bol/bal; Spuiten; Beeldje/figuur; Tafelblad; Gelaagd; Traditioneel; Urn; Muur; Watervalpaneel; Overig
zh-CN: 喷泉设计: 抽象现代; 鸟浴盆; 涌泉石; 层叠式; 柱式; 隐形式; 盆/罐式; 岩层式; 一体式水池; 太阳能漂浮式; 球体/球; 喷水式; 雕像/人物; 台式; 多层式; 传统式; 瓮式; 壁挂式; 瀑布面板式; 其他
fr: Conception de la fontaine: Moderne abstrait; Bain d’oiseaux; Roche bouillonnante; En cascade; Colonne; Disparition; Pot/Bocal; Formation rocheuse; Bassin autonome; Flottant solaire; Sphère/Boule; À jet; Statue/Figurine; De table; À étages; Traditionnel; Urne; Mur; Panneau cascade; Autre
lt-LT: Fontano dizainas: Abstraktus modernus; Paukščių maudyklė; Burbuliuojanti uola; Kaskadinis; Stulpas; Dingstantis; Puodas/Stiklainis; Uolienos susidarymas; Autonominis baseinas; Saulės plūduriuojantys; Sfera/Kamuolys; Sprogimas; Statula / Figūrėlė; Stalinis; Daugiapakopis; Tradicinis; Urna; Siena; Krioklio skydas; Kita
th: การออกแบบน้ำพุ: นามธรรมสมัยใหม่; อ่างน้ำสำหรับนก; หินน้ำพุ; น้ำพุไหลลดหลั่น; คอลัมน์; น้ำพุแบบซ่อนอ่าง; น้ำพุกระถาง/โถ; การก่อตัวของหิน; น้ำพุแบบมีอ่างในตัว; น้ำพุพลังงานแสงอาทิตย์ลอยน้ำ; ทรงกลม/ลูกบอล; น้ำพุพ่น; รูปปั้น/รูปแกะสลัก; ตั้งโต๊ะ; หลายชั้น; แบบดั้งเดิม; ไห; ผนัง; แผงน้ำตก; อื่นๆ
cs: Design fontány: Moderní abstraktní; Pítko pro ptáky; Tryskající skalka; Kaskáda; Sloup; Se skrytou nádrží; Ve tvaru amfory/džbánu; Skalní útvar; Nezávislá; Solární plovoucí; Koule; Tryskající; Socha/figurína; Stolní; Patrové; Tradiční; Amfora; Stěna; Vodní stěna; Jiné
bg-BG: Дизайн на фонтана: Абстрактно модерен; Фонтан за птици; Фонтан скала; Каскада; Колона; Изчезващ; Делва/гърне; Скално образувание; Самостоятелен корито; Слънчево плаващо; Сфера/Топка; Хвърчащо; Статуя/Фигурка; За маса; На нива; Традиционно; Урна; Стена; Панел с водопад; Друго
hr-HR: Dizajn fontane: Apstraktno moderno; Kadica za ptice; Kamen s mjehurićima; Kaskadno; Stup; Nestajuće; S posudom/ćupom; Građa stijene; Samostalni bazen; Solarni plutajući; Oblik sfere/lopte; S prskanjem; Kip/figura; Stolni; Više razina; Tradicionalni; Urna; Zid; Ploča s vodopadom; Ostalo
sv: Fontändesign: Abstrakt Modern; Fågelbad; Bubblande sten; Cascade; Kolumn; Försvinnande; Kruka; Stenformation; Fristående bassäng; Solcellsdriven flytande; Sfär/boll; Sprutande; Staty / Figurett; Bord; Flerlagrad; Traditionell; Urna; Vägg; Vattenfallspanel; Övrigt
pl: Konstrukcja fontanny: Nowoczesny abstrakcyjny; Poidło dla ptaków; Fontanna typu bulgoczący kamień; Kaskadowa; Kolumna; Zanikająca; W formie donicy / dzbana; Formacja skalna; Z wbudowanym zbiornikiem; Solarny pływający; Kula / sfera; Tryskająca; Figura / rzeźba; Stołowe; Kaskadowe; Tradycyjne; Amfora; Ścienne; Panel wodospadowy; Pozostałe